Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202687-1308
Covered online service; acts prohibited.

(1) A covered online service is prohibited from facilitating advertisements for prohibited products, such as narcotic drugs, tobacco products, gambling, and alcohol, to covered minors.

(2) A covered online service is prohibited from using dark patterns.

Laws 2025, LB504, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 38.
July 18, 2026